District of Columbia statutes.
29-102.03

Effective time and date.

Except as otherwise provided in this title and subject to § 29-102.05(d), an entity filing shall be effective:

(1)

On the date and at the time of its filing by the Mayor as provided in § 29-102.06;

(2)

On the date of filing and at the time specified in the entity filing as its effective time, if later than the time under paragraph (1) of this section;

(3)

If permitted by this title, at a specified delayed effective time and date, which shall not be more than 90 days after the date of filing; or

(4)

If a delayed effective date as permitted by this title is specified, but no time is specified, at 12:01 a.m. on the date specified, which may not be more than 90 days after the date of filing.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(5), 59 DCR 13171

History

This section is referenced in § 29-101.02, § 29-307.03, § 29-307.04, § 29-309.06, § 29-407.04, § 29-409.06, § 29-609.05, § 29-702.02, § 29-801.02, § 29-1003.02, § 29-1004.07, § 29-1015.05, § 29-1207.04, and § 29-1208.02.

Section References

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “this title” for “§ 29-102.04” and “§ 29-102.05(d)” for “§ 29 102.05(c)” in the introductory language; and added “which may not be more than 90 days after the date of filing” at the end of (4).

Effect of Amendments

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes